Wyoming, session 2025, SF0047.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 18-9-201(a)(intro) and (c) and
18-9-202(a) are amended to read:

18-9-201. Recreational facilities and systems of
public recreation; authority to establish and maintain;
joint action by political subdivision; tax levies; removal.

SF0047

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0265
(a) The governing body of any city, town, county or
school district either independently or jointly through any
combination thereof, may establish a system of public
recreation as provided by W.S. 18-9-101(a)(i) through (iii)
and, if it does so, shall, subject to W.S. 18-9-202(a), sit
as the board of trustees or appoint a board of trustees to
control, maintain and supervise the properties. If the
governing body of any city, town, county or school district
sits as the board of trustees for a system of public
recreation, it shall not be subject to the requirements of
W.S. 18-9-102(a), (b), (d) or (h). In administering
properties under this section, the board may:

(c) The A governing body which appointed the a member
of the board of trustees may remove that member of the
board of trustees for cause without a public hearing unless
the trustee requests that the action be taken during a
public hearing. If the governing body of a city, town,
county or school district is sitting as the board of
trustees, vacancies shall be filled as provided for by the
applicable governing body. If the board is appointed by the
governing body, vacancies on the board of trustees shall be
SF0047

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0265
filled by the governing body for the balance of the
unexpired term created by the vacancy.

18-9-202. Recreation board of trustees.

(a) The board of trustees appointed under W.S.
18-9-201(a) shall be comprised of not fewer than five (5)
members appointed in accordance with and serving staggered
terms in the same manner as specified under W.S.
18-9-102(a) unless the board of trustees is comprised of
the governing body of any city, town, county or school
district pursuant to W.S. 18-9-201(a). If the public
recreation system is established jointly, the board of
trustees membership shall be not be comprised of a
governing body and shall be comprised of not fewer than
five (5) members appointed in accordance with the a joint
agreement and each participating governing body shall have
at least one (1) member on the board. Any board appointed
or acting as a board under this article is a body
corporate. Liability of board members shall be governed by
W.S. 1-23-107.

SF0047

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0265
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0047